Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1505
Deputy registrar; liquor violations; penalty.

No deputy registrar shall bring, attempt to bring, take, cause to be taken, order, or send into any place of registration or revision of registration any liquor or shall at any such time or place drink or partake of any liquor at such place of registration or revision of registration. A person violating this section shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 404.